North Carolina, session 2025, SB342.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Siler City for the construction of a new
fire station.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S342-v-1*